Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
671D]

HEALTH
CARE PEER REVIEW

Part I. General Provisions

Section

671D-1 Short title

671D-2 Purpose

671D-3 Findings

671D-4 Definitions

Part II. Promotion of Professional Review
Activities

671D-10 Limitation of damages for professional
review actions

671D-11 Standards for professional review actions

671D-12 Attorney's fees

671D-13 Guidelines of the director

671D-14 Construction

Cross References

Diversion program for chemically dependent nurses, see
chapter 334D.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next